Massachusetts, session 194th, H2471.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 244 the
following section:-
Section 245. “Period(s) of Excessive Heat”, a period of time greater than three hours
exceeding in temperature 90 degrees Fahrenheit, and/or of a heat index greater than 95 degrees
Fahrenheit as determined by the National Weather Service.
“Cooling Measures” and “Cooling Centers”, air conditioned publicly accessible building
with a capacity of fifty or more individuals as determined by the state building code 780 CMR;
and/or a dedicated cooling tent with an internal temperature less than 75 degrees Fahrenheit, and
a capacity greater than 50 persons given natural body posture that is established and maintained
by the city or town or the Commonwealth.
All cities and towns in the commonwealth shall provide for their populations cooling
centers during periods of excessive heat. Access to these facilities shall be provided free of
of 2

charge to the residents of the city or town providing the service. The cooling centers must open
no later than one hour following the predicted beginning of the period of excessive heat, and
close no earlier than one hour after the period of excessive heat has concluded, or the ambient
outside temperature has dropped below eighty degrees Fahrenheit, according to the National
Weather Service, whichever occurs first. The Commonwealth of Massachusetts shall have the
power to repurpose facilities under their ownership for the purposes of creating a cooling center
in municipalities that do not otherwise have a cooling center.
The responsibility for funding and maintaining the aforementioned measures of cooling
shall fall upon the cities and towns in which they exist, except for those otherwise maintained by
the state of Massachusetts. The cooling center shall not require a proof of residency for accessing
the facility.
Municipalities for which the construction and/or operation and maintenance of a cooling
center would pose an undue burden may apply for an exemption to this bill from the Department
of Public Health.
of 2